South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4773.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-2920 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-5-2920. (A) AnyNotwithstanding another provision of law, a person who drives any vehicle in such a manner as to indicate either a wilful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property is guilty of reckless driving. The Department of Motor Vehicles, upon receiving satisfactory evidence of the conviction, of the entry of a plea of guilty or the forfeiture of bail of any person charged with a second and subsequent offense for the violation of this section shall forthwith suspend the driver's license of any such person for a period of three months. Only those offenses which occurred within a period of five years including and immediately preceding the date of the last offense shall constitute prior offenses within the meaning of this section. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, entry of a plea of guilty or forfeiture of bail, be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than two hundred dollars or by imprisonment for not more than thirty days.; (B) a person violating the provisions of this section, upon conviction, entry of a plea of guilty, or forfeiture of bail, shall be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than two hundred dollars or by imprisonment for not more than thirty days; (C) upon a second or subsequent conviction, a person shall be required to complete a defensive driving course, as described in Section 56-1-770, and provide proof of the course completion to the Department of Motor Vehicles within sixty days of conviction. If the department does not receive such proof within the specified time, the department shall suspend the person's driving privilege for three months or until proof of completion is received by the department, whichever occurs earlier. If the license of a person is suspended pursuant to the provisions of this section, the person does not have to offer proof of financial responsibility, as required pursuant to Section 56-9-500, prior to the person's license being reinstated; and (D) only those offenses which occurred within a period of three years, including and immediately preceding the date of the last offense, shall constitute prior offenses within the meaning of this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect six months after approval by the Governor. ----XX----